Hawaii statutes.
§451J-5 Prohibited acts. Except
as specifically provided elsewhere in this chapter, no person shall use the
title marriage and family therapist or licensed marriage and family therapist
without first having secured a license under this chapter. The department
shall investigate and prosecute any individual using the title of marriage and
family therapist or licensed marriage and family therapist without being
properly licensed as a marriage and family therapist. Any person who violates
this section shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000 per violation.
Each day's violation shall be deemed a separate offense. Any action taken to
impose or collect the fine imposed under this section shall be a civil action.
[L 1998, c 159, pt of §2; am L 2016, c 29, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next